North Carolina statutes. Chapter 8C. Evidence Code.
Article 11. Miscellaneous Rules.

Rule 1101.
Applicability of rules.

Proceedings generally. — Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) or by statute, these rules apply to all actions and proceedings in the courts of this State.

Rules inapplicable. — The rules other than those with respect to privileges do not apply in the following situations:

Preliminary Questions of Fact. — The determination of questions of fact preliminary to admissibility of evidence when the issue is to be determined by the court under Rule 104(a).

Grand Jury. — Proceedings before grand juries.

Miscellaneous Proceedings. — Proceedings for extradition or rendition; first appearance before district court judge or probable cause hearing in criminal cases; sentencing, or granting or revoking probation; issuance of warrants for arrest, criminal summonses, and search warrants; proceedings with respect to release on bail or otherwise.

Contempt Proceedings. — Contempt proceedings in which the court is authorized by law to act summarily.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1037, s. 14; 1985, c. 509, s. 2.

Commentary

This rule resembles Fed. R. Evid. 1101 with appropriate modifications.

Subdivision (b)(1) restates, for convenience, the provisions of the second sentence of Rule 104(a),
supra.
See Advisory Committee’s Note to that rule.

Current North Carolina practice with respect to voir dire, sentencing hearings, probation revocation hearings, and juvenile proceedings is not meant to be changed by adoption of these rules.

Rule 1102.
Short title.

These rules shall be known and may be cited as the “North Carolina Rules of Evidence.”

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.